Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF60.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1977XS (2) 91 jm/md S.F. 60 Section 1. Section 257.1, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. For a budget year, each school district in the state 3 is entitled to receive foundation aid , in an amount per 4 pupil equal to the difference between the amount per pupil of 5 foundation property tax in the district , otherwise determined 6 under section 257.3 and the combined foundation base per pupil 7 or the combined district cost per pupil, whichever is less for 8 the district . However, if the amount of foundation aid to 9 be received by a school district under this chapter is less 10 than three hundred dollars per pupil the state foundation aid 11 minimum for the district , the district is entitled to receive 12 three hundred dollars per pupil unless the receipt of three 13 hundred dollars per pupil plus the per pupil amount raised by 14 the foundation property tax exceeds the combined district cost 15 per pupil of the district for the budget year state foundation 16 aid in an amount equal to the state foundation aid minimum . 17 In that case, the district is entitled to receive an amount 18 per pupil equal to the difference between the per pupil amount 19 raised by the foundation property tax for the budget year and 20 the combined district cost per pupil for the budget year. If 21 the sum of the amount of foundation aid received by a school 22 district plus the amount of foundation property tax in the 23 district otherwise determined under section 257.3 exceeds the 24 combined foundation base, the department of management shall 25 reduce the districtâs foundation property tax to be collected 26 under section 257.3, subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , or under 27 section 257.3, subsection 2, as applicable, by the amount by 28 which such sum exceeds the combined foundation base and adjust 29 the districtâs foundation property tax rate accordingly. For 30 purposes of this paragraph, âstate foundation aid minimumâ means 31 the sum of the total teacher salary supplement district cost, 32 the total professional development supplement district cost, 33 the total early intervention supplement district cost, and the 34 total teacher leadership supplement district cost. 35 -1- LSB 1977XS (2) 91 jm/md 1/ 3 S.F. 60 Sec. 2. Section 257.2, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 1 by striking the subsection. 2 Sec. 3. Section 257.10, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended 3 by striking the subsection. 4 Sec. 4. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to school budget 5 years beginning on or after July 1, 2026. 6